tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
# Dot 456 Signs
always \x067E\x06C1\x0644 456-1234                                         PHL                 _P          
always \x062A\x064F\x0645\x06C1\x0627\x0631 456-2345                       TUMHAR              _T          
always \x062A\x0645\x06C1\x0627\x0631 456-2345                             TMHAR               _T          
always \x062C\x06C1\x0627\x06BA 456-245                                    JHA;                _J          
always \x0686\x0627\x06C1 456-14                                           CAH                 _C          
always \x0686\x06C1\x0627\x06C1 456-14                                     CHAH                _C          
always \x062E\x0635\x064F\x0648\x0635 456-1346                             X&UW&               _X          
always \x0631\x0646\x06AF 456-1235                                         RNG                 _R          
always \x06A9\x0650\x062F\x06BE\x0631 456-12456                            KED8R               _]       
always \x0633\x0628\x06A9 456-234                                          SBK                 _S           
always \x0634\x0631\x064F\x0648\x0639 456-146                              %RUW(               _%          
always \x0635\x064F\x0648\x0631\x062A 456-12346                            &UWRT               _&          
always \x0639\x0644\x0627\x062D\x062F\x06C1 456-12356                      (LA:DH              _(          
always \x0641\x0627\x0626\x062F\x06C1 456-124                              FA'DH               _F          
noback always \x0641\x0627\x064A\x0654\x062F\x06C1 456-124                 FA'DH               _F                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0642\x0627\x0628\x0650\x0644 456-12345                            QABEL               _Q          
always \x06AF\x064F\x0632\x0627\x0631 456-1245                             GUZAR               _G          
always \x0646\x0650\x06C1\x0627\x06CC\x062A 456-1345                       NEHAIT              _N          
always \x0648\x06C1\x0627\x06BA 456-2456                                   WHA;                _W          
always \x06C1\x0645\x0627\x0631 456-125                                    HMAR                _H          
always \x06CC\x06C1\x0627\x06BA 456-24                                     IHA;                _I          
word \x06A9\x06C1\x0627\x06BA 456-13                                       KHA;                _K          
# New Ones
always \x0622\x0645\x0627\x062F\x06C1 456-345                              >MADH               _>          
always \x0627\x0653\x0645\x0627\x062F\x06C1 456-345                        >MADH               _>                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0628\x0627\x0644\x06A9\x0644 456-12                               BALKL               _B          
always \x0628\x0650\x0627\x0644\x06A9\x064F\x0644 456-12                   BEALKUL             _B
begword \x0645\x064F\x0633\x062A 456-134                                   MUST                _M          
begword \x0645\x0633\x062A 456-134                                         MST                 _M          


# Dot 3456 Signs
always \x062A\x0645\x0627\x0645 3456-2345                                  TMAM                #T          
always \x062E\x0627\x0635 3456-1346                                        XA&                 #X          
always \x06A9\x0627\x0641\x06CC 3456-12456                                 KAFI                #]          
always \x0633\x0627\x062A\x06BE 3456-234                                   SAT8                #S          
always \x06A9\x0650\x0633\x06CC 3456-13                                    KESI                #K          
always \x0648\x0627\x067E\x0633 3456-2456                                  WAPS                #W          
# New Ones
always \x0622\x0648\x0627\x0632 3456-345                                   >WAZ                #>          
always \x0627\x0653\x0648\x0627\x0632 3456-345                             >WAZ                #>                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x067E\x0632\x0646\x062F 3456-1234                                  PZND                #P          
always \x067E\x0633\x0646\x062F 3456-1234                                  PSND                #P

# Dot 56 Signs
always \x0645\x0646\x062F 56-145                                           MND                 ;D
endword \x06AF\x0627\x0631 56-1235                                         GAR                 ;R
always \x062E\x06CC\x0632 56-1356                                          XIZ                 ;Z          
#always \x06CC\x0646\x06AF 56-1245                                          ING                 ;G          Correct but advised to ignore
always \x0646\x06D2\x0020\x0648\x0627\x0644 56-123                         NI WAL              ;L          
always \x0646\x06D2\x0648\x0627\x0644 56-123                               NIWAL               ;L          
always \x0648\x0626\x06CC 56-24                                            W'I                 ;I          
noback always \x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 56-24                               W'I                 ;I                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0648\x0626\x06D2 56-34                                            W'/                 ;/          
noback always \x0648\x064A\x0654\x06D2 56-34                               W'/                 ;/                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x06CC\x062C\x06CC\x06D2 56-13456                                   IJI/                ;Y          
always \x0650\x06CC\x062C\x0626\x06D2 56-13456                             EIJ'/               ;Y
noback always \x0650\x06CC\x062C\x064A\x0654\x06D2 56-13456                       EIJ'/               ;Y                   Added 2020-02-25
# New Ones
always \x062F\x0627\x0634\x062A 56-2345                                    DA%T                ;T
endword \x0641\x0631\x0648\x0634 56-146                                    FRW%                ;%
endword \x0646\x0634\x06CC\x0646 56-1345                                   N%IN                ;N          
endword \x062E\x0627\x0646\x0627 56-125                                    XANA                ;H          


# Dot 6 Signs
word \x0628\x0644\x06A9\x06C1 6-12                                          BLKH               ,B          
word \x0628\x0627\x0648\x062C\x064F\x0648\x062F\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-12-2456 BAWJUWDIKH         ,BW          
word \x0628\x0634\x0631\x062A\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-12-146                    B%RTIKH            ,B%          
word \x062A\x0627\x06A9\x06C1 6-2345                                        TAKH               ,T          
word \x062A\x0627\x0648\x0642\x062A\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-2345-2456           TAWQTIKH           ,TW          
word \x0686\x064F\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-14                              CUWNKH             ,C          
word \x062D\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0646\x06A9\x0650 6-156                       :ALANKE            ,:          
word \x062D\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-156                       :ALANKH            ,:
word \x06D2\x062A\x0651\x0627\x06A9\x0650 6-156-2345                        :,TAKE             ,:T          appears as :T,AKE in text file.
word \x06A9\x06CC\x064F\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-13                        KIUWNKH            ,K          
word \x06A9\x06CC\x0648\x0646\x06A9\x06C1 6-13                              KIWNKH             ,K          
word \x063A\x0631\x0636\x06CC\x06A9\x06C1 6-126                             <R$IKH             ,<          


# Dot 46 Signs - all "New Ones"
always \x067E\x0631\x0633\x062A 46-2345                                     PRST               .T          
endword \x0628\x0627\x062F 46-145                                           BAD                .D          
endword \x06AF\x06CC\x0631 46-1235                                          GIR                .R          
endword \x0627\x0646\x06AF\x06CC\x0632 46-1356                              ANGIZ              .Z          
endword \x0627\x0646\x062F\x06CC\x0634 46-146                               ANDI%              .%          
endword \x062A\x0631\x06CC\x0646 46-1345                                    TRIN               .N          
endword \x06AF\x0627\x06C1 46-125                                           GAH                .H          
noback endword \x0650\x06AF\x0627\x06C1 46-125                              EGAH               .H

# Words beginning HW or HUW
always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0626\x06CC 125-56-24                            HUW'I               H;I          2020-08-28
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 125-56-24               HUW'I               H;I          2020-08-28
always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0626\x06D2 125-56-34                            HUW'/               H;/          2020-08-28
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06D2 125-56-34               HUW'/               H;/          2020-08-28
always \x06C1\x064F\x0624\x0627 125-2456-1                                 HU'WA               HWA
noback always \x06C1\x064F\x0648\x0654\x0627 125-2456-1                    HUW'A               HWA
